chimborazo/qu_EC.aff
# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS common second level
#SFX flag strip add match
SFX c Y 60                 #Verbs: conjugations and the like
SFX c na na//+ na          # Infinitive singular
SFX c na ni//+ na          # Present 1st person singular
SFX c na ngui//+ na         # Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX c na n//+ na           # Present 3rd person singular
SFX c na nchij//+ na       # Present 1st person plural
SFX c na nguichij//+ na     # Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na nguichi/x na     # Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na ncuna//+ na       # Present 3nd person plural
SFX c na sha//+ na         # Future 1st person singular
SFX c na nga//+ na         # Future 3rd person singular/plural
SFX c na ngaj//+ na         # Future 3rd person singular/plural, Personified
SFX c na ngaraicu//+ na    # "With the purpose of ~"
SFX c na shun//+ na        # Future / Imperative 1st person plural
SFX c na shunchij//+ na    # Future 1st person plural ("all of us")
SFX c na shunchi/x na      # Future 1st person plural ("all of us") j->g case flagged a in dic XXX x flag doesnt' work
SFX c na rcani//+ na       # Past 1st person singular
SFX c na rcangui//+ na      # Past 2nd person singular
SFX c na rca//+ na         # Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na rcanchij//+ na    # Past 1st person plural
SFX c na rcanguichij//+ na  # Past 2nd person plural
SFX c na rcacuna//+ na     # Past 3nd person plural
SFX c na ngapaj//+ na      # for/to ~
SFX c na shpaca//+ na      # Contitional same person
SFX c na j//-+ na           # Personification
SFX c na jpi//+ na       # Contitional other person FIXME diff -jpica?
SFX c na jpica//+ na       # Contitional other person
SFX c na rcajpi//+ na      # Conditional Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na i//+ [^i]na       # Imperative 1st person singular not ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c ina i//+ ina       # Imperative 1st person singular ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c na yuj//+ na         # The person having nounified ~ 
SFX c na nayay//+ na       # Causing ~ 
SFX c na yari// na         # More Imperative 1st person singular
SFX c na chun//+ na        # Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX c na ichij//+ na      # Imperative 2nd person plural not ending in "I"
SFX c na ichi/x na      # Imperative 2nd person plural not ending in "I" + ", PUES" special j->g case
SFX c na chuncuna//+ na    # Imperative 3rd person plural
SFX c na shcani//+ na      # Perfect 1st person singular
SFX c na shcangui//+ na     # Perfect 2nd person singular
SFX c na shca//+ na        # Perfect 3rd person singular
SFX c na shcanchij//+ na   # Perfect 1st person plural
SFX c na shcanguichij//+ na # Perfect 2nd person plural
SFX c na shcacuna//+ na    # Perfect 3rd person plural
SFX c na shcarca//+ na     # Plusperfect [persons?]
SFX c na shpa//+ na        # Gerund same person.
SFX c na shcanga//+ na     # Was going to ~
SFX c na pasha//+ na       # POLITE Future 1st person singular
SFX c na pangui//+ na       # POLITE Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX c na pan//+ na         # POLITE Present 3rd person singular
SFX c na panchij//+ na     # POLITE Present 1st person plural
SFX c na panguichij//+ na   # POLITE Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na parcani//+ na     # POLITE Past 1rd person singular
SFX c na parcangui//+ na    # POLITE Past 2nd person singular
SFX c na parcanchij//+ na  # POLITE Past 2nd person plural
SFX c na parca//+ na       # POLITE Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na pashun//+ na      # POLITE Future 1st person plural
SFX c na pai//+ na         # POLITE Imperative 1st person singular not ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c na paiari// na       # POLITE More Imperative 1st person singular
SFX c na pachun//+ na      # POLITE Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX c na paichij//+ na     # POLITE Imperative 2nd person plural
SFX c na pachuncuna//+ na  # POLITE Imperative 3rd person plural

# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS pluralized first level
# (copy the compatible variants from /v above)
#SFX flag strip add match

## the double ## below means version 2: not yuya|nariku|na but yuya|RINAKU|na
# could be this is correct for other verbs...

SFX w Y 27
SFX w 0 na//+p na            # AMONGST~ stem/Infinitive
SFX w 0 rina//+p na          # AMONGST~ reflexive
SFX w 0 rimuna//+p na        # AMONGST~ reflexive "arriving ~ing"
SFX w 0 richina//+p na       # AMONGST~ reflexive "make ~"
SFX w 0 rigrina//+p na       # AMONGST~ reflexive "going to ~"
SFX w 0 rinacuna//+p na      ## AMONGST~ reflexive "constantly ~"
SFX w 0 grina//+p na         # AMONGST~ "going to ~"
SFX w 0 rana//+p na          # AMONGST~ "always ~"
SFX w 0 riyana//+p na        # AMONGST~ "always ~"
SFX w 0 cuna//+p na          # AMONGST~ "constantly ~"
SFX w 0 cumuna//+p na        # AMONGST~ "constantly arriving doing ~"
SFX w 0 cumurina//+p na      # AMONGST~ "constantly arriving doing ~ reflexiwe"
SFX w 0 cuchina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "constantly make ~"
SFX w 0 cugrina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "constantly going to ~"
SFX w 0 nacugrina//+p na     # AMONGST~ "constantly going to ~"
SFX w 0 muna//+p na          # AMONGST~ "arriving ~ing"
SFX w 0 muhuana//+p na        # AMONGST~ "arriving ~ing in my fawor"
SFX w 0 mugrina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "going to arrive ~ing" 
SFX w 0 mucuna//+p na        # AMONGST~ "constantly arriving ~ing"
SFX w 0 wana//+p na          # AMONGST~ "doing ~ in my favor"
SFX w 0 china//+p na         # AMONGST~ "make ~"
SFX w 0 chihuana//+p na       # AMONGST~ "make ~ in my favor"
SFX w 0 chirina//+p na       # AMONGST~ "make ~ for oneself"
SFX w 0 chicuna//+p na       # AMONGST~ "constantly making ~"
SFX w 0 chigrina//+p na      # AMONGST~ "going to make ~"
SFX w 0 chimuna//+p na       # AMONGST~ "arriving making ~"
SFX w 0 chimucuna//+p na       # AMONGST~ "arriving making ~"
