chimborazo/qu_EC.dic
achcayachina//vw
achijchina//vw
achijnina//vw
achijyana//vw
acuna//vw
adivinana//vw
gavillana//vw
adorana//vw
afilana//vw
aglluna//vw
agtuna//vw
ahuana//vw
aichayana//vw
aisana//vw
alabana//vw
allaucanayana//vw
alliana//vw
allishungunayana//vw
alliyachina//vw
alquilachina//vw
alzana//vw
amcasnayana//vw
amina//vw
amintayana//vw
amsanayana//vw
amucnayana//vw
amullina//vw
anchuchina//vw
anchurina//vw
angasnayana//vw
anguyana//vw
animana//vw
apana//vw
apiyana//vw
arina//vw
armarina//vw
arrimana//vw
ashanayana//vw
ashnajnayana//vw
ashnana//vw
asina//vw
asomana//vw
atina//vw
augana//vw
aventana//vw
ayunana//vw
azotina//vw
bailana//vw
bautizana//vw
beneficiana//vw
brujiana//vw
brujuna//vw
bullana//vw
cacharina//vw
c'achuna//vw
cacuna//vw
cainana//vw
callarina//vw
c'amachina//vw
camarina//vw
cambiayana//vw
c'amina//vw
cana//vw
canchisnayana//vw
cangurina//vw
canirina//vw
capajyana//vw
capanayana//vw
caparina//vw
capina//vw
carana//vw
carcayana//vw
carcuna//vw
c'ariana//vw
carinayana//vw
caruyana//vw
casarana//vw
casiana//vw
caspana//vw
caspina//vw
castigana//vw
c'atana//vw
c'atuna//vw
cauchuna//vw
caupuna//vw
causarina//vw
cayana//vw
cazuna//vw
chagrayana//vw
ch'ahuanyana//vw
chajatana//vw
chajnana//vw
ch'ajyachina//vw
challana//vw
challchuyana//vw
challinayana//vw
chamujyana//vw
chapana//vw
chaquina//vw
charijyana//vw
charirana//vw
charquina//vw
chashpina//vw
chasquina//vw
chauanayana//vw
chauayana//vw
chauchayana//vw
chaupina//vw
chaupirina//vw
chayachina//vw
chayarinacuna//vw
ch'icanyana//vw
chichunayana//vw
chijnina//vw
chillpiana//vw
chillpinayana//vw
ch'imbapuna//vw
chincana//vw
chingana//vw
chinina//vw
chirina//vw
chiriyana//vw
chishiyana//vw
ch'ucana//vw
chuchuna//vw
chugrichina//vw
chugrina//vw
chujrina//vw
chullanayana//vw
chullayana//vw
chulluyana//vw
chulunyana//vw
chumbichina//vw
chuncana//vw
chuncanayana//vw
chuncuna//vw
ch'ungullina//vw
chungullina//vw
ch'ungurina//vw
chunuyana//vw
chupina//vw
churana//vw
ch'urvarina//vw
chuscunayana//vw
chuscuyana//vw
chushajyana//vw
chusunayana//vw
chusuyana//vw
chuyacuna//vw
chuyana//vw
chuyanayana//vw
clavana//vw
cobrana//vw
cojana//vw
compañana//vw
confiana//vw
contentarina//vw
convidana//vw
copiana//vw
corralana//vw
crina//vw
cruzana//vw
cuajana//vw
c'uchuna//vw
c'uchunayana//vw
c'uchuyana//vw
cuidana////vw
cullunayana//vw
culluyana//vw
cumuna//vw
cumurina//vw
cunana//vw
cuncana//vw
cuncuna//vw
cungachina//vw
cungarina//vw
cungurina//vw
cunujnayana//vw
cununa//vw
cunyana//vw
curcunayana//vw
curpayana//vw
cururuna//vw
cusana//vw
cushanina//vw
cushiana//vw
cushichina//vw
cushina//vw
cushinayana//vw
cushnichina//vw
cushpana//vw
cushparina//vw
cutana//vw
cutimuna//vw
cutina//wv
c'utsana//vw
cutsinayana//vw
cutuna//vw
cutunayana//vw
cuyachina//vw
c'uyana//vw
cuynana//vw
cuyuna//vw
cuyurina//vw
debilyana//vw
decidina//vw
dedicana//vw
derechana//vw
dibujana//vw
dijdijnina//vw
dirigina//vw
discretoyana//vw
doblana//vw
encinanayana//vw
ententichina//vw
envidiana//vw
espigamuna//vw
faltana//vw
fichunayana//vw
fielyana//vw
fuerzarina//vw
gangozuyana//vw
gordoyana//vw
gratisyana//vw
hillunayana//vw
huacana//vw
huacaysiquinayana//vw
huacunayana//vw
huahuayana//vw
huairana//vw
huajchayana//vw
huajllishcanayana//vw
hualutunayana//vw
huambuna//vw
huampuna//vw
huancuna//vw
huanllana//vw
huaquichina//vw
huashanina//vw
huashaycuna//vw
huasichina//vw
huatuna//vw
huaycana//vw
huaynayana//vw
huayuncana//vw
huichcana//vw
huichinayana//vw
huillana//vw
huiñachina//vw
huirayana//vw
huishturina//vw
humildenayana//vw
illajnayana//vw
importana//vw
iñu//ch
invitana//vw
iquina//vw
irquinayana//vw
ishcaynayana//vw
ishcuna//vw
ismunayana//vw
jachachina//vw
jahuanayana//vw
jamujnayana//vw
janajyna//vw
jananijyana//vw
japina//vw
jatarina//vw
jauina//vw
jayajyana//vw
jichuna//vw
juchana//vw
juilluyana//vw
jujunayana//vw
jundana//vw
juruna//vw
lampina//vw
liyina//vw
llajirina//vw
llampunayana//vw
llashajnayana//vw
llashana//vw
llatunana//vw
llimpijnayana//vw
llimpiyajnayana//vw
lliquina//vw
lluchcana//vw
lluchcayana//vw
lluchuyana//vw
llujinayana//vw
llujshina//vw
llullana//vw
llumiana//vw
llunchina//vw
llushtuna//vw
lutsana//vw
macana//vw
mañachina//vw
mancharina//vw
mantinina//vw
maucanayana//vw
mayayana//vw
mayhuayana//vw
mayllayana//vw
medina//vw
micuna//vw
millaynayana//vw
mincana//vw
ministina//vw
mishana//vw
mishquinayana//vw
mitsajnayana//vw
miyuna//vw
mujachina//vw
mulana//vw
muruchuyana//vw
mushujnayana//vw
muspana//vw
mutiana//vw
mutsuna//vw
muyuyana//vw
nanarina//vw
ñauchina//vw
nayana//vw
ñitina//vw
ñutuyana//vw
obedecina//vw
pacana//vw
pacuyana//vw
pajtana//vw
pallana//vw
pangallayana//vw
pantana//vw
paquina//vw
parlanacuna//vw
pasana//vw
patajnayana//vw
pauana//vw
pezana//vw
pimiana//vw
piñana//vw
piñayana//vw
pingayana//vw
pishcayana//vw
pitina//vw
presochina//vw
puchucana//vw
pudina//vw
pujllana//vw
pulasyana//vw
punchayana//vw
purayana//vw
puscuna//vw
pushcana//vw
puyana//vw
puzujyana//vw
quichciana//vw
quichurina//vw
quillanayana//vw
quillcana//vw
quilluyana//vw
quimsanayana//vw
quinchana//vw
quintiana//vw
quishpichina//vw
quitanayana//vw
raquina//vw
raunana//vw
regana//vw
richajnayana//vw
ricuna//vw
rijchacana//vw
rijsina//vw
rina//vw
rsarquina//vw
runtuna//vw
rutuna//vw
sajranayana//vw
samana//vw
sañiana//vw
santificana//vw
saquina//vw
sasirna//vw
satirina//vw
saytiana//vw
semana//vw
shalacanayana//vw
shayajyana//vw
shaycuna//vw
shinayana//vw
shuhuana//vw
shulluna//vw
shutichina//vw
shutuna//vw
shuyushcanayana//vw
sinchiana//vw
sincuna//vw
sirana//vw
sisana//vw
soloyana//vw
suchuyana//vw
sujtayana//vw
sumajyana//vw
tajalina//vw
tallina//vw
tamiana//vw
tanijyana//vw
tantarina//vw
tapana//vw
tarina//vw
tigrachina//vw
tijllanayana//vw
timpuna//vw
tipina//vw
trabajana//vw
tsagnana//vw
tsancana//vw
tsangayana//vw
tsigllanayana//vw
tsirapana//vw
tsuncana//vw
tucuna//vw
tujuchina//vw
tulana//vw
tuñirina//vw
tushuna//vw
uhuna//vw
ujllana//vw
ujuyana//vw
unana//vw
ungina//vw
upanayana//vw
upiana//vw
uriana//vw
urmana//vw
usyana//vw
uyana//vw
viajana//vw
visitana//vw
yachana//vw
yallina//vw
yananayana//vw
yanayana//vw
yanuna//vw
yapuna//vw
yaycuna//vw
yurajyana//vw
yuyajyana//vw
yuyayyana//vw
